Ohio, session 136, HB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.079 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 5.079. Beginning on April 18, 2033, in recognition o f 5
the cultural significance of "Superman" entering the public 6
domain, the character "Superman" is adopted as the official 7
superhero of the state. The first publication including the 8
character Superman occurred on April 18, 1938. 9